Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska77-3505
Qualified claimant, defined.

A qualified claimant shall mean an owner of a homestead during the calendar year for which the claim is made who was sixty-five years of age or older before January 1 of such year and who shall be entitled to relief pursuant to section 77-3507.

Laws 1979, LB 65, § 5;

Laws 1981, LB 179, § 18;

Laws 1986, LB 1258, § 1;

Laws 1987, LB 376A, § 4.